Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1097.
do enact as follows:SB1097,11Section 1. 15.01 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1097,3,6215.01 (6) “Division,” “bureau,” “section,” and “unit” means the subunits of a 3department or an independent agency, whether specifically created by law or 4created by the head of the department or the independent agency for the more 5economic and efficient administration and operation of the programs assigned to 6the department or independent agency. The office of credit unions in the 7department of financial institutions, the office of the inspector general in the 8department of children and families, the office of the inspector general in the 9department of health services, the office of the public intervenor in the office of the 1commissioner of insurance, and the office of children’s mental health in the 2department of health services have the meaning of “division” under this subsection. 3The office of the long-term care ombudsman under the board on aging and long-4term care and the office of educational accountability and the office of literacy in 5the department of public instruction have the meaning of “bureau” under this 6subsection.SB1097,27Section 2. 15.732 of the statutes is created to read:SB1097,3,10815.732 Same; attached office. (1) Office of the public intervenor. 9There is created an office of the public intervenor which is attached to the office of 10the commissioner of insurance under s. 15.03.SB1097,311Section 3. 20.145 (1) (g) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1097,3,141220.145 (1) (g) 1. All moneys received under ss. 601.25 (2), 601.31, 601.32, 13601.42 (7), 601.45, and 601.47 and by the commissioner for expenses related to 14insurance company restructurings, except for restructurings specified in par. (h).SB1097,415Section 4. 601.25 of the statutes is created to read:SB1097,3,1916601.25 Office of the public intervenor. (1) The office of the public 17intervenor shall assist individuals with insurance claims, policies, appeals, and 18other legal actions to pursue insurance coverage for medical procedures, 19prescription medications, and other health care services.SB1097,3,2420(2) The office of the public intervenor may levy an assessment on each insurer 21that is authorized to engage in the business of insurance in this state. The 22assessment levied under this subsection shall be based on the insurer’s premium 23volume for disability insurance policies, as defined in s. 632.895 (1) (a), written in 24this state.SB1097,4,21(3) The commissioner may provide by rule for the governance, duties, and 2administration of the office of the public intervenor.SB1097,53Section 5. 601.45 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1097,4,124601.45 (1) Costs to be paid by examinees. The reasonable costs of 5examinations and audits under ss. 601.43, 601.44, 601.455, and 601.83 (5) (f) shall 6be paid by examinees except as provided in sub. (4), either on the basis of a system 7of billing for actual salaries and expenses of examiners and other apportionable 8expenses, including office overhead, or by a system of regular annual billings to 9cover the costs relating to a group of companies, or a combination of such systems, 10as the commissioner may by rule prescribe. Additional funding, if any, shall be 11governed by s. 601.32. The commissioner shall schedule annual hearings under s. 12601.41 (5) to review current problems in the area of examinations.SB1097,613Section 6. 601.455 of the statutes is created to read:SB1097,4,1514601.455 Fair claims processing, health insurance transparency, and 15claim denial rate audits. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1097,4,2116(a) “Claim denial” means the refusal by an insurer to provide payment under 17a disability insurance policy for a service, treatment, or medication recommended 18by a health care provider. “Claim denial” includes the prospective refusal to pay for 19a service, treatment, or medication when a disability insurance policy requires 20advance approval before a prescribed medical service, treatment, or medication is 21provided.SB1097,4,2222(b) “Disability insurance policy” has the meaning given in s. 632.895 (1) (a).SB1097,4,2323(c) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1) (a) to (p).SB1097,5,224(2) Claims processing. (a) Insurers shall process each claim for a disability 1insurance policy within a time frame that is reasonable and prevents an undue 2delay in an insured’s care, taking into account the medical urgency of the claim.SB1097,5,63(b) If an insurer determines additional information is needed to process a 4claim for a disability insurance policy, the insurer shall request the information 5from the insured within 5 business days of making the determination and shall 6provide at least 15 days for the insured to respond.SB1097,5,77(c) All claim denials shall include all of the following:SB1097,5,981. A specific and detailed explanation of the reason for the denial that cites 9the exact medical or policy basis for the denial.SB1097,5,12102. A copy of or a publicly accessible link to any policy, coverage rules, clinical 11guidelines, or medical evidence relied upon in making the denial decision, with 12specific citation to the provision justifying the denial.SB1097,5,15133. Additional documentation, medical rationale, or criteria that must be met 14or provided for approval of the claim, including alternative options available under 15the policy.SB1097,5,1816(d) If an insurer uses artificial intelligence or algorithmic decision-making in 17processing a claim for a disability insurance policy, the insurer must notify the 18insured in writing of that fact. The notice shall include all of the following:SB1097,5,21191. A disclosure that artificial intelligence or algorithmic decision-making was 20used at any stage in reviewing the claim, even if a human later reviewed the 21outcome.SB1097,5,24222. A detailed explanation of how the artificial intelligence or algorithmic 23decision-making reached its decision, including any factors the artificial 24intelligence or algorithmic decision-making weighed.SB1097,6,213. A contact point for requesting a human review of the claim if the claim was 2denied.SB1097,6,53(3) Independent review of denials. In addition to an insured’s right to an 4independent review under s. 632.835, as applicable, insureds have the right to 5request a review by the office of the public intervenor of any claim denial.SB1097,6,76(4) Prohibited practices. An insurer may not do any of the following with 7respect to a disability insurance policy:SB1097,6,88(a) Use vague or misleading policy terms to justify a claim denial.SB1097,6,99(b) Fail to provide a specific and comprehensible reason for a claim denial.SB1097,6,1110(c) Cancel coverage under the policy after a claim is submitted due to alleged 11misstatements on the policy application.SB1097,6,1312(d) Deny a claim based on hidden or ambiguous exclusions in a disability 13insurance policy.SB1097,6,1414(e) Stall review of a claim to avoid timely payment.SB1097,6,1615(f) Reject a claim without reviewing all relevant medical records or consulting 16qualified experts.SB1097,6,1817(g) Fail to properly review or respond to an insured’s appeal in a timely 18manner.SB1097,6,2019(h) Allow non-physician personnel to determine whether care is medically 20necessary.SB1097,6,2221(i) Apply different medical necessity criteria based on financial interests 22rather than patient needs.SB1097,6,2423(j) Disregard a treating health care provider’s medical assessment without a 24valid clinical reason.SB1097,7,21(k) Mandate prior approval for routine or urgent procedures in a manner that 2causes harmful delays.SB1097,7,53(L) For a disability insurance policy that provides coverage of emergency 4medical services, refuse to cover emergency medical services provided by out-of-5network providers. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1097 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1097 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1097 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1097 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1097: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting